Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-505
Congressional districts; population figures and maps; basis.

For purposes of section 32-504, the Legislature adopts the official population figures and maps from the 2020 Census Redistricting (Public Law 94-171) TIGER/Line Shapefiles published by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 101;

Laws 2001, LB 851, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB704, § 2;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 2.